Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,102
Indemnification of officers, employees, and agents.

Unless limited by a corporation's articles of incorporation:

(1) An officer of a corporation who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 21-1998, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under section 21-19,100 in each case, to the same extent as a director;

(2) The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under sections 21-1996 to 21-19,104 to an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation who is not a director to the same extent as to a director; and

(3) A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent who is not a director to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 102.